District of Columbia statutes.
16-1025

Prosecution by Attorney General.

Prosecutions under this subchapter shall be brought in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in name of the District by the Corporation Counsel.

May 23, 1986, D.C. Law 6-115, § 6, 33 DCR 2424
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 25(f), 36 DCR 492
1981 Ed., § 16-1025.